Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.480

Underground electric and communication facilities, installation or conversion to—Applicability of general provisions relating to county road improvement districts.

Unless otherwise provided in RCW 36.88.410 through 36.88.480, the general provisions relating to county road improvement districts shall apply to local improvements authorized by RCW 36.88.410 through 36.88.480.

[ 1967 c 194 s 8.]